Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Filing Documents

§ 17-16-120.
Requirements for documents.

A document shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies from these requirements, to be entitled to filing by the secretary of state.

This act shall require or permit filing the document in the office of the secretary of state.

The document shall contain the information required by this act. It may contain other information as well.

The document shall be typewritten or printed or, if electronically transmitted, it shall be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced in typewritten or printed form.

The document shall be in the English language. A corporate name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals, and the certificate of existence required of foreign corporations need not be in English if accompanied by an English translation acceptable to the secretary of state.

The document shall be executed:

By the chairman of the board of directors of a domestic or foreign corporation, by its president, or by another of its officers;

If directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The person executing the document shall sign it and shall state beneath or opposite his signature his name and the capacity in which he signs. The document may but need not contain:

The corporate seal;

An attestation by the secretary or an assistant secretary;

An acknowledgment, verification or proof.

If the secretary of state has prescribed a mandatory form for the document under W.S.

17-16-121

, the document shall be in or on the prescribed form.

The document shall be delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing. Delivery may be made by electronic transmission if and to the extent permitted by the secretary of state. If it is filed in typewritten or printed form and not transmitted electronically, the secretary of state may require one (1) exact copy to be delivered with the document, except as provided in W.S.

17-28-103

.

When any document is delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing, the correct filing fee, and any franchise tax, license fee, penalty or past due fees, taxes or penalties required to be paid by this act or other law shall be paid or provision for payment made in a manner provided by the secretary of state.

Reserved.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3; 2014 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, substituted “17-28-103” for “17-16-503 and 17-16-1509” in (j)(i).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “or, if electronically transmitted, it shall be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced in typewritten or printed form” in (d); deleted “manually” after “shall sign it” in the introductory language of (g); rewrote (j) to update delivery format; and added (k).

The 2014 amendment,

in (j), substituted “any document” for “the document” and “fee, penalty or past due fees, taxes or penalties required to be paid by” for fee or penalty required to be paid therewith by.”

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-121.
Forms.

If the secretary of state so requires, use of forms provided by the secretary of state pursuant to this subsection is mandatory. The secretary of state may prescribe and furnish on request forms for:

An application for a certificate of existence;

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state;

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of withdrawal;

The annual report;

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of continuance;

An application for a certificate of transfer;

A foreign corporation’s application for certificate of domestication; and

A consent of registered agent to appointment.

The secretary of state may prescribe and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by this act but their use is not mandatory.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-122.
Filing, service and copying fees.

The secretary of state shall set and collect filing, service and copying fees to recover his costs to administer this act. Fees shall not exceed the costs of providing these services.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Editor's notes. —

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

§ 17-16-123.
Effective time and date of document.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section and W.S. 17-16-124(c), a document accepted for filing pursuant to W.S.

17-16-120

is effective:

As of the time received for filing, as evidenced by such means as the secretary of state may use for the purpose of recording the date and time of filing; or

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the ninetieth (90th) day after the date it is filed.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “pursuant to W.S.

17-16-120

” in the introductory language of (a); and made stylistic changes.

§ 17-16-124.
Correcting filed document.

A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a document filed with the secretary of state if the document:

Contains an inaccuracy;

Was defectively executed, attested, sealed, verified, or acknowledged; or

The electronic transmission was defective.

A document is corrected:

By preparing articles of correction that:

Describe the document, including its filing date, or attach a copy of the document to the articles of correction;

Specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected; and

Correct the inaccuracy or defect.

By delivering the articles of correction to the secretary of state for filing.

Articles of correction are effective on the effective date of the document they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when filed.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(iii); and made stylistic changes.

§ 17-16-125.
Filing duty of secretary of state.

If a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of W.S.

17-16-120

, the secretary of state shall file the document.

The secretary of state files a document by stamping or otherwise endorsing “Filed,” together with his official title and the date and time of filing, on both the original and the document copy and on the receipt for the filing fee. The secretary of state may prescribe rules for filing of electronic transmissions. After filing a document, except as provided in W.S.

17-28-103

, the secretary of state shall deliver the document copy, with the filing fee receipt (or acknowledgement of receipt if no fee is required) attached, to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative. The secretary of state, in his discretion, may issue a certificate evidencing the filing of a document upon the payment of the requisite fee.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document, he shall return it to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative within fifteen (15) days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for his refusal.

The secretary of state’s duty to file documents under this section is ministerial. His filing or refusing to file a document does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or part;

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document; or

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2017 ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, substituted “17-28-103” for “17-16-503 and 17-16-1510” in (b).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the second sentence in (b).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “fifteen (15) days” for “five (5) days.”

§ 17-16-126.
Appeal from secretary of state's refusal to file document.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document delivered to his office for filing, the domestic or foreign corporation may, within thirty (30) days after the return of the document, appeal the refusal to the district court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located in the state or, if the corporation does not have a principal office in the state, the district court of the county where its registered office is or will be located, or the district court of the county of residence of an incorporator for a domestic corporation, or in the district court of Laramie county. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the secretary of state’s explanation of his refusal to file.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

§ 17-16-127.
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate from the secretary of state delivered with a copy of a document filed by the secretary of state is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “from the secretary of state delivered with a copy of a document filed by the secretary of state” for “attached to a copy of a document filed by the secretary of state, bearing his signature (which may be in facsimile) and the seal of this state.”

§ 17-16-128.
Certificate of existence.

Anyone may apply to the secretary of state to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic corporation or a certificate of authorization for a foreign corporation.

A certificate of existence or authorization sets forth:

The domestic corporation’s corporate name or the foreign corporation’s corporate name used in this state;

That:

The domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this state, the date of its incorporation, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual; or

The foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in this state.

That all fees, taxes, and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if:

Payment is reflected in the records of the secretary of state; and

Nonpayment affects the existence or authorization of the domestic or foreign corporation.

That its most recent annual report required by W.S.

17-16-1630

has been filed by the secretary of state;

That articles of dissolution have not been filed; and

Other facts of record in the office of the secretary of state that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or authorization issued by the secretary of state may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in existence or is authorized to transact business in this state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-129.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 91, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1, related to the penalty for signing false documents.